Hawaii statutes.
§576B-703 Relationship of support
enforcement agency to United States central authority. The support
enforcement agency of this State is recognized as the agency designated by the
United States central authority to perform specific functions under the Convention.
[L 2015, c 77, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next